District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-533

Application for license; collection and disposition of fees; examinations; issuance of licenses

Repealed.

History

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 20, 29 DCR 5297

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-2701 to 2-2712.